New York, session 2025-2026, S234.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (n) and (o) of subdivision 3 of section 265.01-e 2 of the penal law, paragraph (n) as amended and paragraph (o) as added by 3 section 1 of part F of chapter 55 of the laws of 2023, are amended and a 4 new paragraph (p) is added to read as follows: 5 (n) persons while participating in military ceremonies, funerals, and 6 honor guards; [or] 7 (o) persons while lawfully engaging in learning, practicing, training 8 for, competing in, or travelling into or within the state to learn, 9 practice, train for, or compete in, the sport of biathlon, in accordance 10 with all applicable local, state, and federal laws, rules, and regu- 11 lations[.]; or 12 (p) persons who are retired judges of the court of appeals, justices 13 of the supreme court, judges of the court of claims, judges of the 14 county court, judges of the surrogate's court, judges of the family 15 court, judges of a court for the city of New York, judges of the 16 district court, and judges of a city court outside of the city of New 17 York, and who are duly licensed to possess a pistol or revolver pursuant 18 to section 400.00 of this chapter. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01064-01-5